Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 13A Administrative Regulations
13A.320.
Amendment of administrative regulation during meeting of legislative committee or public meeting — Format.

An administrative body may amend an administrative regulation at a legislative committee meeting with the consent of the legislative committee. A legislative committee may amend an administrative regulation at a legislative committee meeting with the consent of the administrative body.

An administrative regulation shall not be amended at a public meeting of a legislative committee unless the amendment concerns an issue that was related to the administrative regulation filed with the Legislative Research Commission and was:

Considered at the public hearing;

Raised pursuant to a comment received by the administrative body at the public hearing or during the public comment period pursuant to KRS 13A.280(1); or

Raised during the legislative committee meeting.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require the administrative regulation’s resubmission or refiling or other action. The administrative regulation may be adopted as amended.

Following approval of an amendment to an administrative regulation at a legislative committee meeting, the administrative regulation as amended shall be published in the Administrative Register, unless all amendments to the administrative regulation that were made at the meeting of the legislative committee:

Relate only to the formatting and drafting requirements of KRS 13A.220(5) and 13A.222(4)(b), (c), (i), (j), and (l); and

Do not alter the intent, meaning, conditions, standards, or other requirements of the administrative regulation.

If the amendments to an administrative regulation made at a meeting of a legislative committee meet the exception requirements of paragraph (d) of this subsection, the regulations compiler shall publish a notice in the Administrative Register that the administrative regulation was amended at a legislative committee meeting only to comply with the formatting and drafting requirements of this chapter.

When an administrative body intends to amend an administrative regulation at a meeting of a legislative committee, the following requirements shall be met:

Amendments offered by the administrative body prior to a legislative committee meeting shall be approved by the head of the administrative body.

Amendments shall be contained in a letter to the legislative committee. The letter shall:

Identify the administrative body;

State the number and title of the administrative regulation;

Be dated;

Be filed with the regulations compiler at least three (3) workdays prior to the meeting of the legislative committee if the amendments are initiated by the administrative body; and

Comply with the format requirements in paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection if the amendments are initiated by the administrative body.

On separate lines, the amendment shall be identified by the number of the:

Page;

Section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, clause, or subclause, as appropriate; and

Line.

If a word or phrase, whether or not underlined, is to be deleted, the amendment shall identify the word or phrase to be deleted and state that it is to be deleted. If a word or phrase is to be replaced by another word or phrase, the amendment shall specify the word or phrase that is to be deleted and shall specify the word or phrase that is to be inserted in lieu thereof.

If new language is to be inserted, the amendment shall state that it is to be inserted, and the new language shall be underlined.

If the amendment consists of no more than four (4) words, the words shall be placed between quotation marks. If the amendment consists of more than four (4) words, the amendment shall be indented and not placed between quotation marks.

If a section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, clause, or subclause is to be deleted in its entirety, the amendment shall identify it and state that it is deleted in its entirety, whether or not it contains underlined or bracketed language.

If an amendment is drafted by legislative committee staff on behalf of a legislative committee, the amendment shall be made:

In the format required by subsection (2)(c) and (d) of this section; or

By substituting the complete text of the administrative regulation, with the proposed changes made to the administrative regulation typed in bold, italicized, and in the format prescribed by KRS 13A.222(2).

An amendment to an administrative regulation may be made orally at a legislative committee meeting if the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section are met.

Except for an amendment made orally pursuant to subsection (4) of this section:

For a meeting of the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee, an administrative body shall submit twenty (20) copies of an amendment to an administrative regulation to the regulations compiler prior to the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee meeting at which the amendment will be considered and, if applicable, in accordance with the deadline established in subsection (2)(b)4. of this section; or

For a meeting of a legislative committee other than the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee, an administrative body shall contact the regulations compiler prior to the legislative committee meeting at which the amendment will be considered to find out the number of copies needed for that specific legislative committee. The original amendment and the specified number of copies shall be submitted to the regulations compiler prior to the legislative committee meeting at which the amendment will be considered and, if applicable, in accordance with the deadline established in subsection (2)(b)4. of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 32, effective April 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 71, § 5, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 425, § 12, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 516, § 30, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 410, § 25, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 180, § 16, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 38, § 10, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 89, § 17, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 100, § 21, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 138, § 15, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 82, § 31, effective July 15, 2016; 2021 ch. 7, § 16, effective February 2, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Environmental Quality Commission could amend a regulation at an Administrative Review Subcommittee meeting without filing a revised statement of consideration and publishing such changes pursuant to KRS

13A.280

where the amendments were subsequently published in the administrative register; the changes in the regulation complied with this section and were properly amended.

OAG 87-6

.

13A.330.
Notification of finding of deficiency — Governor’s determination after finding of deficiency.

If a filed ordinary administrative regulation has been found deficient, the legislative committee shall transmit to the Governor and the regulations compiler:

A copy of the finding of deficiency and other relevant findings, recommendations, or comments; and

A request that the Governor determine whether the administrative regulation shall:

Be withdrawn;

Be amended at a legislative committee meeting pursuant to KRS

13A.320

to conform to the finding of deficiency; or

Become effective pursuant to the provisions of this section notwithstanding the finding of deficiency.

The Governor shall transmit his or her determination to the Commission and the regulations compiler.

A filed ordinary administrative regulation that has been found deficient shall be considered as adopted and become effective after:

The review period established in this chapter has been completed; and

The regulations compiler has received the Governor’s determination that the administrative regulation shall become effective pursuant to the provisions of this section notwithstanding the finding of deficiency; or

The legislative committee that found the filed administrative regulation deficient subsequently determines that it is not deficient in accordance with KRS

13A.335

, provided that this determination was made prior to receipt by the regulations compiler of the Governor’s determination.

If an emergency administrative regulation has been found deficient, the legislative committee finding it deficient shall transmit to the Governor and the regulations compiler:

A copy of the finding of deficiency and other relevant findings, recommendations, or comments; and

A request that the Governor determine whether the emergency administrative regulation shall:

Be withdrawn;

Be amended at a legislative committee meeting pursuant to KRS

13A.320

to conform to the finding of deficiency; or

Remain effective as established in KRS 13A.190(4) notwithstanding the finding of deficiency.

The Governor shall transmit his or her determination to the Commission and the regulations compiler.

The legislative committee that found the emergency administrative regulation deficient may subsequently determine that it is not deficient in accordance with KRS

13A.335

.

If an effective ordinary administrative regulation has been found deficient by a legislative committee, the legislative committee shall transmit to the Governor a copy of its finding of deficiency and other findings, recommendations, or comments it deems appropriate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 33, effective April 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 71, § 6, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 516, § 31, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 410, § 26, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 180, § 17, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 269, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 38, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 350, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 406, § 19, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 100, § 22, effective June 20, 2005; 2019 ch. 192, § 13, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 7, § 17, effective February 2, 2021.

13A.331.
Adoption and effective date of ordinary administrative regulation that has been referred to a legislative committee.

A filed ordinary administrative regulation that has not been deferred or found deficient and has been referred by the Commission to a legislative committee shall be considered as adopted and shall become effective:

Upon adjournment of a meeting of a legislative committee other than the subcommittee if:

The administrative regulation was on the meeting agenda; and

A quorum was present;

Upon adjournment of a meeting of a House or Senate standing committee if:

The administrative regulation was on its meeting agenda;

A quorum was present; and

The administrative regulation has previously been on a meeting agenda of the other standing committee when a quorum was present; or

At the expiration of the review period established in KRS 13A.290(7), if within the review period a legislative committee has failed to meet or failed to place a filed administrative regulation on a meeting agenda.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 406, § 22, effective July 14, 2000; 2019 ch. 192, § 14, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 7, § 18, effective February 2, 2021.

13A.333.
Expiration of deficient regulations. [Repealed.]

13A.335.
Reasons administrative regulation found deficient shall not be considered deficient — Notice.

A filed administrative regulation found deficient by a legislative committee shall not be considered deficient if:

A subsequent amendment of that administrative regulation is filed with the Commission by the administrative body;

The legislative committee that found the administrative regulation deficient approves a motion that the subsequent amendment corrects the deficiency; and

Any legislative committee that reviews the administrative regulation under the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A finds that the administrative regulation is not deficient.

A filed administrative regulation found deficient by the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee shall not be considered deficient if:

The administrative regulation is amended to correct the deficiency at a meeting of the legislative committee to which it was assigned by the Commission;

That legislative committee does not determine that the administrative regulation is deficient for any other reason; and

The Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee approves a motion that the deficiency has been corrected and that the administrative regulation should not be considered deficient.

A filed administrative regulation found deficient by a legislative committee with subject matter jurisdiction shall not be considered deficient if the legislative committee:

Reconsiders the administrative regulation and its finding of deficiency; and

Approves a motion that the administrative regulation is not deficient.

If an amendment to an effective administrative regulation is going through the KRS Chapter 13A promulgation process and is found deficient by a legislative committee, the administrative regulation shall not be considered deficient if the:

Administrative regulation was found deficient due to the amendment;

Promulgating administrative body has withdrawn the proposed amendment of the existing administrative regulation; and

Regulations compiler has not received the Governor’s determination pursuant to KRS

13A.330

.

If an effective administrative regulation is found deficient by a legislative committee, the administrative regulation shall not be considered deficient if the subcommittee:

Reconsiders the administrative regulation and its finding of deficiency; and

Approves a motion that the administrative regulation is not deficient.

If an administrative regulation has been found deficient by a legislative committee, the regulations compiler shall add the following notice to the administrative regulation: “This administrative regulation was found deficient by the [name of legislative committee] on [date].” This notice shall be the last section of the administrative regulation.

If an administrative regulation has been found deficient by a legislative committee, subsequent amendments of that administrative regulation filed with the Commission shall contain the notice provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

If an administrative regulation that has been found deficient by a legislative committee has subsequently been determined not to be deficient under the provisions of this section, the regulations compiler shall delete the notice required by paragraph (a) of this subsection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 516, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 180, § 19, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 350, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 406, § 21, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 100, § 23, effective June 20, 2005; 2019 ch. 192, § 15, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 7, § 19, effective February 2, 2021.

13A.336.
Annual report on administrative regulations found deficient — Contents.

After the last regularly scheduled meeting of the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee in a calendar year, but by the thirty-first day of December of that calendar year, the staff of the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee shall submit a report to the co-chairs of that subcommittee regarding administrative regulations that were found deficient by any legislative committee of the Commission during that calendar year.

The report in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall contain:

Effective administrative regulations that were found deficient; and

Administrative regulations filed with the Commission that were found deficient.

The report shall not contain any administrative regulation that was found deficient and:

Has been withdrawn; or

Is no longer considered deficient under KRS

13A.335

.

The report shall contain at least the following information for each administrative regulation in the report:

Administrative regulation number and title;

Name of the promulgating agency;

Date of deficiency determination;

Name of the legislative committee that made the deficiency determination;

Effective date, if it is in effect;

The finding of deficiency and any other findings, recommendations, or comments sent to the Governor; and

If applicable under KRS

13A.330

, the Governor’s determination regarding the deficiency, if received by the Commission.

The first page of the report required by subsection (1) of this section shall contain the following text, in fourteen (14) point font or larger:

“To ratify the deficiency findings listed in this report, a co-chair or other legislator may request that Legislative Research Commission staff prepare a bill:

Declaring that one (1) or more administrative regulations listed in the report shall be void; or

Amending the relevant subject matter statutes in conformity with the findings of deficiency.”

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 192, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 7, § 20, effective February 2, 2021.

13A.337.
Legislative finding — Certain administrative regulations void — Prohibition against promulgating substantially similar regulations — Judicial review.

The General Assembly finds that certain administrative regulations, as evidenced by the records of the Legislative Research Commission, including but not limited to the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service and the Administrative Register of Kentucky, were found deficient on or after July 15, 1988, and either expired prior to or upon adjournment of the 2001 General Assembly, or were scheduled to expire upon adjournment of the 2002 Regular Session of the General Assembly, under the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A as existing before the issuance of the Opinion and Order of the Franklin Circuit Court in Patton v. Sherman et al., Civil Action No. 01-CI-00660, entered January 11, 2002.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative regulations identified in subsection (1) of this section shall be null, void, and unenforceable, as follows:

Those administrative regulations identified in subsection (1) of this section which expired prior to or upon adjournment of the 2001 Regular Session of the General Assembly under the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A existing before the issuance of the court order referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be null, void, and unenforceable as of their recorded date of expiration, according to the records of the Legislative Research Commission. Administrative bodies and regulated persons and entities have relied on the assumption that these administrative regulations have previously expired; therefore, this subsection shall have the retroactive effect necessary to implement its provisions; and

Those administrative regulations identified in subsection (1) of this section due to expire upon adjournment of the 2002 Regular Session of the General Assembly, under the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A existing before the issuance of the court order referenced in subsection (1) of this section, shall be null, void, and unenforceable on March 27, 2002.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, an administrative body shall be prohibited from promulgating an administrative regulation that is identical to or substantially the same as any administrative regulation identified in subsection (1) of this section for a period beginning on January 11, 2002, and concluding upon adjournment of the 2003 Regular Session of the General Assembly. This subsection shall have the retroactive effect necessary to implement its provisions.

The Legislative Research Commission may file an action in the Franklin Circuit Court for judicial review to determine if any administrative regulation is lawfully promulgated in accordance with the laws and Constitution of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 76, § 1, effective March 27, 2002.

13A.338.
Legislative finding — Certain administrative regulations void — Prohibition against promulgating substantially similar regulations within specified time.

The General Assembly finds that certain administrative regulations as evidenced by the records of the Legislative Research Commission, including but not limited to the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service and the Administrative Register of Kentucky, were found deficient but became effective notwithstanding the finding of deficiency, pursuant to KRS

13A.330

, on or after March 27, 2002, and before March 16, 2004.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, each administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be null, void, and unenforceable as of March 16, 2004.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative body shall be prohibited from promulgating an administrative regulation that is identical to, or substantially the same as, any of the administrative regulations referenced in subsection (1) of this section for a period beginning on March 16, 2004, and concluding on June 1, 2005.

A list of the administrative regulations referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be available to the public, in the office of the Legislative Research Commission’s regulations compiler.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 11, § 1, effective March 16, 2004; 2021 ch. 7, § 21, effective February 2, 2021.

13A.339.
Unenforceability of certain administrative regulations that became effective notwithstanding finding of deficiency.

The General Assembly finds that certain administrative regulations as evidenced by the records of the Legislative Research Commission, including but not limited to the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service and the Administrative Register of Kentucky, were found deficient but became effective notwithstanding the finding of deficiency, pursuant to KRS

13A.330

, on or after April 15, 2020, and before January 5, 2021, and were found deficient pursuant to KRS

13A.336

including:

803 KAR 2:180, Labor Cabinet, Department of Workplace Standards, Recordkeeping, reporting, statistics;

921 KAR 3:025, Cabinet for Health and Family Services, Department for Community Based Services, Technical requirements; and

921 KAR 3:025E, Cabinet for Health and Family Services, Department for Community Based Services, Technical requirements, emergency.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, each administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be null, void, and unenforceable as of June 29, 2021.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative body shall be prohibited from promulgating an administrative regulation that is identical to, or substantially the same as, any of the administrative regulations referenced in subsection (1) of this section for a period beginning on March 30, 2021, and concluding on June 1, 2022.

A list of the administrative regulations referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be available to the public, in the office of the Legislative Research Commission’s regulations compiler.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 165, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

13A.340.
Notification of administrative regulations filed prior to July 14, 1984, which are to remain in effect — Procedure — Repeal of administrative regulations for which no notice is received by July 1, 1985. [Repealed.]

13A.341.
Unenforceability of 702 KAR 1:195E, Face Coverings in School Facilities, after September 9, 2021.

The General Assembly finds that 702 KAR 1:195E, Face Coverings in School Facilities, was found deficient but remained effective notwithstanding the finding of deficiency pursuant to KRS

13A.330

, on or after August 17, 2021, and before September 9, 2021, as evidenced by records of the Legislative Research Commission.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be null, void, and unenforceable five (5) working days from September 9, 2021.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative body shall be prohibited from promulgating an administrative regulation that is identical to, or substantially the same as, the administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section for a period beginning on September 9, 2021, and concluding on June 1, 2023.

The administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be available to the public, in the office of the Legislative Research Commission’s regulations compiler.

HISTORY:

2021 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 4, § 2, effective September 9, 2021.

13A.342.
Unenforceability of 902 KAR 2:211E, Covering the Face in Response to Declared National or State Public Health Emergency, as of September 9, 2021.

The General Assembly finds that 902 KAR 2:211E, Covering the Face in Response to Declared National or State Public Health Emergency, was found deficient and then later withdrawn by the agency on June 11, 2021, as evidenced by the records of the Legislative Research Commission.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be null, void, and unenforceable as of September 9, 2021.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative body shall be prohibited from promulgating an administrative regulation that is identical to, or substantially the same as, the administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section for a period beginning on September 9, 2021, and concluding on June 1, 2023.

The administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be available to the public, in the office of the Legislative Research Commission’s regulations compiler.

HISTORY:

2021 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 5, § 10, effective September 9, 2021.

13A.343.
Unenforceability of 902 KAR 2:212E, Covering the Face in Response to Declared National or State Public Health Emergency, as of September 9, 2021.

The General Assembly finds that 902 KAR 2:212E, Covering the Face in Response to Declared National or State Public Health Emergency, was found deficient but remained effective notwithstanding the finding of deficiency pursuant to KRS

13A.330

, on or after March 30, 2021, and before September 9, 2021, as evidenced by the records of the Legislative Research Commission.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be null, void, and unenforceable as of September 9, 2021.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative body shall be prohibited from promulgating an administrative regulation that is identical to, or substantially the same as, the administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section for a period beginning on September 9, 2021, and concluding on June 1, 2023.

The administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be available to the public, in the office of the Legislative Research Commission's regulations compiler.

HISTORY:

2021 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 5, § 11, effective September 9, 2021.

13A.344.
Unenforceability of 902 KAR 2:213E, Childcare Standards for Covering the Face in Response to Declared National or State Public Health Emergency, as of September 9, 2021.

The General Assembly finds that 902 KAR 2:213E, Childcare Standards for Covering the Face in Response to Declared National or State Public Health Emergency, was found deficient but remained effective notwithstanding the finding of deficiency pursuant to KRS

13A.330

, on or after March 30, 2021, and before September 9, 2021, as evidenced by the records of the Legislative Research Commission.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be null, void, and unenforceable as of September 9, 2021.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative body shall be prohibited from promulgating an administrative regulation that is identical to, or substantially the same as, the administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section for a period beginning on September 9, 2021, and concluding on June 1, 2023.

The administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be available to the public, in the office of the Legislative Research Commission's regulations compiler.

HISTORY:

2021 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 4, § 1, effective September 9, 2021.

13A.3441.
Unenforceability of proposed amendment to 803 KAR 25:190, relating to utilization review and medical bill audits, as of April 14, 2022.

The General Assembly finds that a proposed amendment of 803 KAR 25:190, relating to utilization review and medical bill audits, filed with the Commission on February 18, 2021, by the Labor Cabinet, Department of Workers’ Claims, was found deficient on or after March 30, 2021, and before January 4, 2022, but determined to become effective notwithstanding the finding of deficiency pursuant to KRS

13A.330

, as evidenced by records of the Legislative Research Commission.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding:

If the proposed amendment of 803 KAR 25:190 referenced in subsection (1) of this section has not been adopted on or before April 14, 2022, the proposed amendment shall expire as of April 14, 2022; or

If the proposed amendment of 803 KAR 25:190 referenced in subsection (1) of this section has been adopted on or before April 14, 2022, 803 KAR 25:190 shall be null, void, and unenforceable as of April 14, 2022.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative body shall be prohibited from promulgating an administrative regulation that is identical to, or substantially the same as, the proposed amendment of 803 KAR 25:190 referenced in subsection (1) of this section for a period beginning on January 4, 2022, and concluding on June 1, 2023.

The proposed amendment referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be available to the public, in the office of the Legislative Research Commission’s regulations compiler.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 217, § 1, effective April 14, 2022.

13A.3442.
Unenforceability of 702 KAR 1:192E, District Employee Quarantine Leave, as of April 14, 2022.

The General Assembly finds that 702 KAR 1:192E, District Employee Quarantine Leave, was found deficient pursuant to KRS

13A.330

, on or after March 30, 2021, and before April 14, 2022, as evidenced by the records of the Legislative Research Commission.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be null, void, and unenforceable as of April 14, 2022.

Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative body shall be prohibited from promulgating an administrative regulation that is identical to, or substantially the same as, the administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section for a period beginning on January 4, 2022, and concluding on June 1, 2023.

The administrative regulation referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be available to the public, in the office of the Legislative Research Commission’s regulations compiler.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 217, § 2, effective April 14, 2022.

13A.345.
Expiration of administrative regulations — Enactment of regulations into statute. [Repealed.]

13A.346.
Quadrennial review of administrative regulations by LRC subcommittee — Schedule. [Repealed.]

13A.347.
Assignment by LRC to subcommittee — Public meeting — Reports required — Expiration of administrative regulations — Enactment into statute — Prohibition concerning promulgation. [Repealed.]

13A.350.
Application of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all grants of authority to promulgate administrative regulations and no administrative regulation shall be promulgated or adopted unless in conformity with the provisions of this chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all other acts passed by the 1984 Session of the General Assembly.

Any grant of authority for an administrative body to promulgate rules or standards is repealed, unless authorized by this chapter.

Any grant of authority for an administrative body to promulgate administrative regulations which is in conflict with the provisions of this chapter shall be repealed to the extent that it conflicts with the provisions of this chapter, regardless of whether the grant of authority is broader than that contained in this chapter.

Any existing statute and any act passed by the 1984 Session of the General Assembly which is in conflict with the provisions of this chapter is repealed to the extent of the conflict.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 35, effective April 13, 1984.